District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

47-2813

Keeping or storing of moving picture films.

Repealed.

History

July 1, 1902, 32 Stat. 624, ch. 1352, § 7, par. 13
July 1, 1932, 47 Stat. 552, ch. 366
enacted, Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-254,§ 2, 44 DCR 1575
Apr. 20, 1999, D.C. Law 12-261, § 2003(pp)(10), 46 DCR 3142

Cross References

Mayor, Council and other offices, application of certain sections to boards, commissions and committees, see § 1-321.02.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 47-2813.
1973 Ed., § 47-2313.